Hawaii statutes.
§143-17 Wrongful interference with
officers. It shall be unlawful for any person to resist or obstruct any
officer in the exercise of the officer's duties as provided in this chapter. [L
1941, c 268, §15; RL 1945, §7166; RL 1955, §156-17; HRS §143-17; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next